src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_21_ae_even 
  +Sg      :         nom_end                  ;
  +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:         par_V              ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg+Dial/Var:         par_A              ; ! karamellia
  +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn           ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA              ; ! karamellina
  +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even    ;
  +Pl      :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2i    gen_tten    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2i       par_tA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2%>i       par_end     ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA     ill_hiin    ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       ess_nA      ;
  +Pl      :%>i2       com_ne      ;
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2  sgpl_cases_even    ; ! Adding  to block i:0

LEXICON n_21_odd !!= * @CODE@  kajava
+N         :  x_21_odd ;

LEXICON x_21_odd !!= * @CODE@  kajava
x_21_odd_nomsg ;
x_21_odd_oblique ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_nomsg
  +Sg          :             nom_end              ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_oblique 
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_odd ;
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por :             par_V          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A          ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn       ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nnA        ;

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i     gen_tten       ; ! kajaviitten ! TODO Why WG here and not it par?
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i        par_tA         ; ! kajaviita
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
!      +Pl+Ill:%^HMETA%>hii n_PxK          ;
  +Pl      :%^HMETA      ill_hiin       ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ; !Jok loistaava
  +Pl      :^WG^A0%>i2      sgpl_cases_odd ; ! TODO any cases here that should have ^AO?
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2%>ksi    PxxK           ;

LEXICON n_21_A0 !!= * @CODE@  opettaaja, tapattuma
+N         :  x_21_A0 ;

LEXICON x_21_A0 !!= * @CODE@  
x_21_A0_nomsg ;
x_21_A0_oblique ;

LEXICON x_21_A0_nomsg
  +Sg          :             nom_end          ;

LEXICON x_21_A0_oblique 
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_even  ;
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por :             par_V            ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A             ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A             ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn         ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nA           ;

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t            ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i     gen_tten       ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i        par_tA      ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; 
!      +Pl+Ill:%^HMETA%>hii n_PxK             ;
  +Pl      :%^HMETA      ill_hiin             ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         com_ne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         com_ne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         com_ne         ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^A0%>i2      sgpl_cases_even   ; 
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2%>ksi    PxxK                   ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_pl !!= * @CODE@  kattoojat
+N         :  x_21_odd_pl ;


LEXICON x_21_odd_pl 
  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i     gen_tten       ; ! kajaviitten ! TODO Why WG here and not it par?
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0%>i2      gen_tten       ; ! kajavitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2i        par_tA         ; ! kajaviita
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2%>i      par_end        ; ! %> i necessary, otherwise a:o NOTwork, kajavii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2%>       par_A          ; ! kajavia
!      +Pl+Ill:%^HMETA%>hii n_PxK          ;
  +Pl      :%^HMETA      ill_hiin       ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0%>i2         com_nne        ; !Jok loistaava
  +Pl      :^WG^A0%>i2      sgpl_cases_odd ; ! TODO any cases here that should have ^AO?
! +Pl+Tra:%>i2%>ksi    PxxK           ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_u

+N         :  x_21_odd_u ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_u

  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         gen_tten        ;
 ! +Pl      :^AO%>i2            par_tA          ; ! TODO: saada selville jos tämä ryhmä saa -tA päätteen
   +Pl+Dial/Por      :%>i2            par_end          ; 
  +Pl      :^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :%>i2            ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :%>i2            com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


LEXICON n_21_even_u

+N         :  x_21_even_u ;

LEXICON x_21_even_u 

  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_even  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         gen_tten        ;
 ! +Pl      :^AO%>i2            par_tA          ; ! TODO: saada selville jos tämä ryhmä saa -tA päätteen
   +Pl+Dial/Por      :%>i2            par_end          ; 
  +Pl      :^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :%>i2            ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :%>i2            com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


LEXICON n_21_odd_AO !valinta> valinttoi. For the nouns that ends in -a and where the stem change to -o in plural, and also that have special gemination in pl par. We might have to change pl par for the same reason as in "perintö". 

+N         :  x_21_odd_AO ;
