src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
ajjaaja:ajjaaja n_21_odd ;
jalkapallonpellaaja:jalkapallon#pellaaja n_21_odd ;
lähđetyssaarnaaja:lähđetys#saarnaaja n_21_odd ;
maksaaja:maksaaja n_21_odd ;
kevätaijantassaaja:kevätaijan#tassaaja n_21_odd ;
hihtaaja:hihtaaja n_21_odd ;
prosektinjohtaaja:prosektin#johtaaja n_21_odd ;
johtaaja:johtaaja n_21_odd ;
aloittaaja:aloittaaja n_21_A0 ;
kalastaaja:kalastaaja n_21_A0 ;
silmänaukaistaaja:silmän#aukaistaaja n_21_A0 ;
omistaaja:omistaaja n_21_A0 ;
vahvistaaja:vahvistaaja n_21_A0 ;
puristaaja:puristaaja n_21_A0 ;
linnunfangittaaja:linnun#fangittaaja n_21_A0 ;
vaphauttaaja:vaphauttaaja n_21_A0 ;
hajoittaaja:hajoittaaja n_21_A0 ;
harjoittaaja:harjoittaaja n_21_A0 ;
vajelttaaja:vajelttaaja n_21_A0 ;
vapattaaja:vapattaaja n_21_A0 ;
matkustaaja:matkustaaja n_21_A0 ;
johđattaaja:johđattaaja n_21_A0 ;
suunitelma:suunitelma n_21_A0 ;
vaikutelma:vaikutelma n_21_A0 ;
kokkousprotokolla:kokkous#protokolla n_21_A0 ;
venheittenrakenttaaja:venheitten#rakenttaaja n_21_A0 ;
taittaaja:taittaaja n_21_odd ;
ilmoittaaja:ilmoittaaja n_21_A0 ;
jokapäivä-polttaaja:jokapäivä-#polttaaja n_21_odd ;
auttaaja:auttaaja n_21_odd ;
rattastaaja:rattastaaja n_21_A0 ; 
puolustaja:puolustaja n_21_A0 ;
maksaposteja:maksa#posteja n_21_odd ;
kattoojat:kattooja n_21_odd_pl ;
amppuuja:amppuuja n_21_odd ;
saitamatala:saita#matala n_21_odd ;
bensa-asema:bensa-#asema n_21_odd ;
kulttuuritapattuma:kulttuuri#tapattuma n_21_A0 ;
mammona:mammona n_21_odd ;
pataljoona:pataljoona n_21_A0 ;
veranta:veranta n_21_odd_AO ;
valinta:valinta n_21_odd_AO ;
dokumentasuunihallinta:dokumentasuuni#hallinta n_21_odd_AO ;
luononhallinta:luonon#hallinta n_21_odd_AO ;
hallinta:hallinta n_21_odd_AO ;
poiminta:poiminta n_21_odd_AO ;
toiminta:toiminta n_21_odd_AO ;
valvonta:valvonta n_21_odd_AO ;
maininta:maininta n_21_odd_AO ;
karjunta:karjunta n_21_odd_AO ;
luononvalvonta:luonon#valvonta n_21_odd_AO ;
trafikinvalvonta:trafikin#valvonta n_21_odd_AO ;
opintotarjonta:opinto#tarjonta n_21_odd_AO ;
lastentarastarjonta:lastentaras#tarjonta n_21_odd_AO ;
palvelutarjonta:palvelu#tarjonta n_21_odd_AO ;
hieronta:hieronta n_21_odd_AO ;
kiljunta:kiljunta n_21_odd_AO ;
tarjonta:tarjonta n_21_odd_AO ;
ulvonta:ulvonta n_21_odd_AO ;
harmaajakajava+Err/Orth:harmajakajava n_21_odd ;
juttelu:juttelu n_21_odd_u ;
luononvarjelu:luonon#varjelu n_21_odd_u ;
lastensuojelu:lasten#suojelu n_21_odd_u ;
persoonansuojelu:persoonan#suojelu n_21_odd_u ;
elläintenvarjelu:elläinten#varjelu n_21_odd_u ;
hommailu:hommailu n_21_odd_u ;
kiussailu:kiussailu n_21_odd_u ;
sylkäisy:sylkäisy n_21_odd_u ;
voimailmaisu:voima#ilmaisu n_21_odd_u ;
varjelu:varjelu n_21_odd_u ;
kuvvailu:kuvvailu n_21_odd_u ;
tappelu:tappelu n_21_odd_u ;
loppuselvittely:loppu#selvittely n_21_even_u ;
perustelu:perustelu n_21_even_u ;
erikoisvaihettelu:erikois#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
spesiaaligraadivaihettelu:spesiaaligraadi#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
graadivaihettelu:graadi#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
spesiaalivaihettelu:spesiaali#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
tavaranvaihettelu:tavaran#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
ylheisvaihettelu:ylheis#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
äänenvaihettelu:äänen#vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
vaihettelu:vaihettelu n_21_even_u ;
viskuttelu:viskuttelu n_21_even_u ;
onnittelu:onnittelu n_21_even_u ;
sovittelu:sovittelu n_21_even_u ;
alasuunittelu:ala#suunittelu n_21_even_u ;
äänisuunittelu:ääni#suunittelu n_21_even_u ;
suunittelu:suunittelu n_21_even_u ;
kulttuurikohđattelu:kulttuuri#kohđattelu n_21_even_u ;
keskustelu:keskustelu n_21_even_u ;
tervheyspalvelu:tervheys#palvelu n_21_odd_u ;
palvelu:palvelu n_21_odd_u ;
konstiluistelu:konsti#luistelu n_21_odd_u ;
kilppailu:kilppailu n_21_odd_u ;
ratkaisu:ratkaisu n_21_odd_u ;
pintaviljely:pinta#viljely n_21_odd_u ;
kävely:kävely n_21_odd_u ;
tervettely:tervettely n_21_even_u ;
vähättely:vähättely n_21_even_u ;
jutonäyttely:juto#näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
kesänäyttely:kesä#näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
siirtonäyttely:siirto#näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
näyttely:näyttely n_21_odd_u ;
daatankäsittely:daatan#käsittely n_21_even_u ;
käsittely:käsittely n_21_even_u ;
joulupötäjä:joulu#pötäjä n_21_odd ;
keittääjä:keittääjä n_21_odd ;
öystäetelä:öystä#etelä n_21_odd ;
ylinäkymä:yli#näkymä n_21_odd ;
koulufröökynä:koulu#fröökynä n_21_odd ;
elävä:elävä n_21_odd ;
